District of Columbia statutes.
22-1320

Sale of tobacco to minors under 18 years of age.

Recodified as § 7-1721.02

Feb. 7, 1891, 26 Stat. 736, ch. 117
May 2, 1991, D.C. Law 8-262, § 3, 37 DCR 8434

History

This section is referenced in § 47-2404.

Section References